New York, session 2025-2026, A11431.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 13.19 of the parks, recreation and historic preser- 2 vation law, as amended by chapter 616 of the laws of 2023, subdivision 2 3 as amended by chapter 103 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 § 13.19 Free use of parks and campsites. 1. Notwithstanding the 6 provisions of any other law, any person who is blind, non-ambulatory, or 7 an amputee [or], any veteran or member of a Gold Star family, or any 8 member or citizen of a state or federally recognized Native American 9 nation shall be permitted to use any of the public campsites, parks and 10 other public places of recreation in this state, upon the same terms and 11 conditions as apply to the general public, but without the payment of 12 any fees or other charges for the use of such campsites, parks and other 13 public places of recreation. 14 2. For the purposes of this section (a) "veteran" shall mean a resi- 15 dent of this state who is: (i) a veteran as such term is defined in 16 section one of the veterans' services law; or (ii) a person who has 17 served on active duty for the state as a member of the state organized 18 militia as defined in subdivision nine of section one of the military 19 law and who was discharged or released therefrom under conditions other 20 than dishonorable; or (iii) a person who has served on active duty in 21 the uniformed services of the United States or on active duty for the 22 state as a member of the organized militia and has a qualifying condi- 23 tion, as defined in section one of the veterans' services law, and has 24 received a discharge other than bad conduct or dishonorable from such 25 service, or is a discharged LGBT veteran, as defined in section one of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06940-01-5 A. 11431 2 1 the veterans' services law, and has received a discharge other than bad 2 conduct or dishonorable from such service; and 3 (b) "member of a Gold Star family" shall mean a resident of this state 4 who is a gold star parent as defined in section twenty-six of the veter- 5 ans' services law, the spouse or domestic partner, or the biological, 6 step, or legally adopted minor child of a veteran whose death qualified 7 the parent for an annuity. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 10 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 11 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 12 on or before such effective date.